Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.023, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Final billing for submetered utility service. new text end new text begin If, by the date the tenant vacates the unit, a landlord has not received from the utility provider the actual utility bill for utility service, the landlord may issue an estimated final utility bill to the tenant. The calculation must be based on the immediately preceding billing period for the submetered utility bill charged to the tenant, prorated for the number of days between the end of the prior billing period and the date the tenant vacates the unit. No additional fees or charges may be assessed, except that nothing in this subdivision prohibits a landlord from assessing and including in the final utility bill: new text end new text begin (1) an administrative billing charge authorized under subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (2) a late payment charge authorized under subdivision 6, provided that the late payment charge reflects only a late fee for unpaid charges from the immediately preceding billing period. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 504B.118, is amended to read: 504B.118 deleted text begin RECEIPT FOR RENT PAID IN CASHdeleted text end new text begin PAYMENT OF RENTnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Receipt for rent paid in cash. new text end A landlord receiving rent or other payments from a tenant in cash must provide a written receipt for payment immediately upon receipt if the payment is made in person, or within three business days if payment in cash is not made in person. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Digital payment platforms. new text end new text begin (a) If a landlord requires or permits a tenant to pay rent and other charges using a digital payment platform, a landlord must offer a tenant an alternative to using the digital payment platform if the platform is not functioning. No fee may be charged to the tenant to use an alternative form of payment. new text end new text begin (b) If the digital payment platform is known to be not functioning, the landlord must restore access to the digital payment platform or offer an alternative means of payment as soon as practicable. new text end new text begin (c) A landlord is prohibited from taking any adverse action, including but not limited to filing an eviction or assessing late fees, when payment of rent or other charges is not paid because both the digital payment platform and the alternative payment method the landlord provided are not functioning for the tenant. The tenant has an affirmative defense against an eviction action filed for nonpayment of rent if the landlord violates this section. Upon a showing that the landlord has violated this section, the eviction action must be dismissed, and the tenant is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and any other equitable relief the court deems appropriate. new text end new text begin (d) For the purposes of this subdivision, "digital payment platform" means an electronic application or system, under the direct control of the landlord or operated by a vendor under contract with the landlord, that permits a user to conduct financial transactions. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 504B.216, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Final billing for apportioned utility service. new text end new text begin If, by the date the tenant vacates the unit, a landlord has not received from the utility provider the actual utility bill for utility service, the landlord may issue an estimated final utility bill to the tenant. The calculation must be based on the immediately preceding billing period for the apportioned utility bill charged to the tenant, prorated for the number of days between the end of the prior billing period and the date the tenant vacates the unit. No additional fees or charges may be assessed, except that nothing in this subdivision prohibits a landlord from assessing and including in the final utility bill: new text end new text begin (1) an administrative billing charge authorized under subdivision 8; and new text end new text begin (2) a late payment charge authorized under subdivision 9, provided that the late payment charge reflects only a late fee for unpaid charges from the immediately preceding billing period. new text end